Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 4 Shellfish
27-4-199.
Evidence of intent to use as food; inspection of businesses.

The distribution, sale, or possession with intent to distribute or sell any shellfish shall be prima-facie evidence that the shellfish were intended for use as food unless prior written approval from the department authorizing such possession of shellfish is presented.

Game wardens and other authorized personnel of the department are authorized to take samples from, to enter and have access to, and to examine during normal working hours and at any time when the licensed or authorized activity is being conducted all water bottoms, places of business, and other places where shellfish are grown, kept, stored, sold, or held in possession with intent to distribute, sell, or give away. Such personnel are also authorized at any time to take such samples of shellfish as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this article and to have access to and take samples from all streams, tributaries thereof, and lands adjacent thereto, the waters draining from which may come into contact with shellfish. It shall be unlawful for any person to obstruct or in any way interfere with any game warden or other authorized personnel of the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

Prior to and at point of landing game wardens and other authorized personnel of the department are authorized to seize, confiscate, and remove any and all shellfish discovered which were taken or possessed in violation of this article. Whenever a game warden or other authorized personnel of the department believes that shellfish examined may have been taken, contained, or stored in such a manner that may render the shellfish adulterated, misbranded, tainted, or otherwise which may pose a public health problem, the game warden or other authorized personnel of the department is authorized to seize, confiscate, and remove any and all shellfish. Such shellfish shall be destroyed or returned to the resource according to methods as the department may prescribe.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-199

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 6; Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and effective March 1, 2020 for all other purposes,
substituted “water bottoms” for “shellfish beds” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (b). The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Game wardens” for “Conservation rangers” at the beginning of subsection (b); substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in the last sentence of subsection (b) and in two places in the second sentence in subsection (c); and substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 3/HB 501, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law with such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.” This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2019.

27-4-200.
Forged or false documents, records, or permits unlawful.

It shall be unlawful to knowingly produce, manufacture, or possess any forged or false documents, records, or permits provided for in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 6; Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501, effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and effective March 1, 2020 for all other purposes,
reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 3/HB 501, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law with such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.” This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2019.

27-4-201.
Penalty for violation of article; revocation of authorizations.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any person who violates any provision of this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

Any authorizations issued under this part to any person convicted of violating any provision of this article shall be revoked by operation of law and shall not be reissued for a period of three years. The department shall notify the person in writing of the revocation. Prior to revocation, such person shall have opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 6; Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and effective March 1, 2020 for all other purposes,
designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 3/HB 501, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law with such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.” This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2019.

27-4-202.
Shellfish mariculture permit; bond requirement of master harvester; penalty for noncompliance.

It shall be unlawful for a master harvester to engage in shellfish mariculture activities without first obtaining a shellfish mariculture permit from the department. A detailed mariculture operational plan must be approved by the department prior to any shellfish mariculture permit being issued. An operational plan shall include the species to be farmed, types of gear, amounts, locations, sources and types of shellfish seed including genetic strains, a storm mitigation plan, a wildlife interaction mitigation plan, and any other information required by the department.

Permits may be conditioned by the department to include requirements related to shellfish production, mariculture operations, public rights of access and nonconflicting uses of permitted areas, and correction of environmental degradation resulting from the permitted activity.

Shellfish mariculture activities on a subtidal water bottoms lease shall require a performance bond provided to the director by a master harvester to ensure compliance with the procedures and standards contained in this part. Such performance bond shall be in the amount of $20,000.00 and conditioned upon faithful compliance with the conditions and terms of this part. Such performance bond shall be placed on file with the director. The bond shall be made payable to the director and issued by an insurance company authorized to issue such bonds in this state. If any party is aggrieved or adversely affected by the master harvester’s failure to comply with the requirements of this article, the director may commence and maintain an action against the principal and surety on the bond.

The department shall not issue any new leases or permits or renew any leases or permits unless the leasing application is accompanied by a letter from the director or his or her designee stating that the applicant’s bond is acceptable. Failure to provide an acceptable bond shall constitute grounds for denial of the issuance or renewal of a lease or permit.

Upon a determination by the director that a master harvester, or an agent or employee responsible for harvesting, has failed to meet the standards as set out in this part, the director may, after written notice of such failure to the master harvester or the agent or employee responsible for harvesting:

Forfeit or draw that amount of such bond that the director determines necessary to correct the violations;

Expend such amount for such purposes;

Enter into contracts for such purposes; or

Require the replacement of that amount of such bond forfeited or drawn upon.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and became effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.

27-4-203.
Conditional certifications of shellfish hatcheries and nursery operations; approval of out-of-state hatcheries; authorization for operation; conditions for permitting; revocation.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the department may conditionally certify shellfish hatchery and nursery operations within the state, may approve out-of-state hatcheries for importation of shellfish seed into the state, and may issue authorization to shellfish hatchery and nursery operators to receive shellfish for mariculture activities.

The department may grant permits to master harvesters to import hatchery produced shellfish seed under the following conditions:

Shellfish seed shall be certified disease-free by an approved shellfish pathologist; and

The importation of shellfish seed is confined to seed that originates from department approved hatcheries.

Failure to comply with department rules and regulations, in whole or in part, may result in revocation of any applicable shellfish mariculture permits granted pursuant to this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 69, § 1/HB 501.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and became effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “originates” was substituted for “originate” in paragraph (b)(2).

27-4-204.
Permitting; number of cages; identification attached to cages.

The first time that a person obtains or renews a shellfish mariculture permit, he or she shall obtain a permit from the department establishing the maximum number of cages that may be deployed at any given time during that license year. Such permits shall be issued in 25 cage increments. The permittee shall pay a fee of $1.00 per cage for the permit, and the permit shall be for the same duration and shall be renewed at the same time as the shellfish mariculture permit. Containers used for the mariculture of clams shall be exempt from this subsection.

No cage permit may be amended to permit the use of more cages except at the time of permit renewal. The permittee, or his or her agent or employee if the permittee is not actively harvesting, shall have the cage permit in his or her possession at all times while harvesting.

It shall be unlawful for any permittee or a person designated by such permittee as provided in Code Section 27-4-202 to employ more cages than the number allowed by the cage permit at any time.

It shall be unlawful to set or place in the salt waters of this state any shellfish mariculture cage which does not have attached to it the identification assigned by the department to the permittee. The identification shall be assigned by the department to the permittee when such permittee is issued his or her shellfish mariculture permit. For subsequent years, the same identification shall be assigned to such permittee.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 1/HB 501.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and became effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes.